California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) The assessor may institute an audit or verification of the operations of the owner or operator of the applicant’s property to ascertain whether both the owner and operator meet the requirements of Section 214.

(c) (1) The assessor may deny a claim for the welfare exemption on a property, notwithstanding that the claimant has been granted an organizational clearance certificate by the board.

(2) If the assessor finds that the claimant’s property is ineligible for the welfare exemption or the veterans’ organization exemption, the assessor shall notify the claimant in writing of all of the following:

(A) That the property is ineligible for the exemption.

(B) That the claimant may seek a refund of property taxes paid by filing a refund claim with the county.

(C) That if the claimant’s refund claim with the county is denied, the claimant may file a refund action in superior court.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an applicant, granted a welfare exemption and owning any property exempted pursuant to Section 214.15 or Section 231, shall not be required to reapply for the welfare exemption in any subsequent year in which there has been no transfer of, or other change in title to, the exempted property and the property is used exclusively by a governmental entity or by a nonprofit corporation described in Section 214.15 for its interest and benefit. The applicant shall notify the assessor on or before February 15 if, on or before the preceding lien date, the applicant became ineligible for the welfare exemption or if, on or before that lien date, the property was no longer owned by the applicant or otherwise failed to meet all requirements for the welfare exemption.

Prior to the lien date, the assessor shall annually mail a notice to every applicant relieved of the requirement of
 filing an annual application by this subdivision.

The notice shall be in a form and contain that information that the board may prescribe, after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, and shall set forth the circumstances under which the property may no longer be eligible for exemption, and advise the applicant of the duty to inform the assessor if the property is no longer eligible for exemption.

The notice shall inform any applicant desiring to maintain eligibility for the welfare exemption under Section 214.15 or Section 231 for the next fiscal year of the procedure to reaffirm exemption eligibility. The failure to reaffirm eligibility for the exemption does not of itself constitute a waiver of exemption as called for by the California Constitution, but may result in additional contact by the assessor to verify exempt activity.

(e) Upon any indication that a welfare exemption or veterans’ organization exemption on the property has been incorrectly granted, the assessor shall redetermine eligibility for the exemption. If the assessor determines that the property, or any portion thereof, is no longer eligible for the exemption, he or she shall immediately cancel the exemption on so much of the property as is no longer eligible for the exemption.

(f) If a welfare exemption or veterans’ organization exemption on the property has been incorrectly allowed, an escape assessment as provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 531) of Chapter 3 in the amount of the exemption, with interest as provided in Section 506, shall be made, and a penalty shall be assessed for any failure to notify the assessor as required by this section in an amount equaling 10 percent of the escape assessment, but may not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(g) Pursuant to Section 15640 of the Government Code, the board shall review the assessor’s administration of the welfare exemption and the veterans’ organization exemption as part of the board’s survey of the county assessment roll to ensure the proper administration of the exemption.

(h) Notwithstanding Section 20, for purposes of this section “board” means the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 56.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

254.6.

(a) An organization that intends to claim the welfare exemption or veterans’ organization exemption shall file with the State Board of Equalization a claim for an organizational clearance certificate.

(b) The board staff shall review each claim for an organizational clearance certificate for the welfare exemption to ascertain whether the organization meets the requirements of Section 214 and shall issue a certificate to a claimant that meets these requirements. The board staff shall also review each claim for an organizational clearance certificate for the veterans’ organization exemption to ascertain whether the organization meets the requirements of Section 215.1 and shall issue a certificate to a claimant that meets these
 requirements. In this connection, the board staff shall consider, among other matters, whether:

(1) The services and expenses of the owner or operator (including salaries) are excessive, based upon like services and salaries in comparable public or private institutions.

(2) The operations of the owner or operator, either directly or indirectly, materially enhance the private gain of any individual or individuals.

(c) Any claim of any organization that files for an organizational clearance certificate for the first time shall be accompanied by the claimant’s corporate identification number, mailing address, and all of the following documents:

(1) A certified copy of the financial statements of the organization.

(2) A certified copy of the articles of incorporation and any amendments thereto, or in the case of any noncorporate fund or foundation, its bylaws, articles of association, constitution, or regulations and any amendments thereto.

(3) A copy of a valid, unrevoked letter or ruling from either the Franchise Tax Board or, in the alternative, the Internal Revenue Service, that states that the organization qualifies as an exempt organization under the appropriate provisions of the Bank and Corporation Tax Law or the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) (1) If the board staff determines that a claimant is not eligible for an organizational clearance certificate, the board shall notify the claimant of the ineligibility.

(2) The claimant may file an
 appeal of the board staff’s finding of ineligibility with the board within 60 days of the date of mailing of the notice of ineligibility. The appeal of the board staff’s finding shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the appeal is founded.

(3) The board shall conduct a hearing on the appeal in accordance with any rules of notice, procedure, and briefing as the board shall prescribe. The parties to the hearing or proceeding shall be the board staff and the claimant appealing the finding of ineligibility. The board staff and the claimant may agree in writing to submit the matter to the board for a decision without a hearing. The board shall provide written findings and conclusions or a written decision to support its decision.

(e) (1) Once granted, an organizational clearance certificate for the welfare exemption remains valid until
 the board staff determines that the organization no longer meets the requirements of Section 214. Once granted, an organizational clearance certificate for the veterans’ organization exemption remains valid until the board staff determines that the organization no longer meets the requirements of Section 215.1.

(2) If the board staff determines that the organization no longer meets the requirements for an organizational clearance certificate, the board staff shall revoke the certificate and notify the claimant and each county assessor of the revocation.

(3) The organization may file an appeal of the board staff’s revocation with the board within 60 days of the date of mailing of the notice revocation. The appeal of the revocation shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the appeal is founded.

(4) The board shall conduct a hearing on the appeal in accordance with any rules of notice, procedure, and briefing as the board shall prescribe. The parties to the hearing or proceeding shall be the board staff and the claimant appealing the finding of ineligibility. The board staff and the claimant may agree in writing to submit the matter to the board for decision without hearing. The board shall provide written findings and conclusions or a written decision to support its decision.

(f) Pursuant to Section 15618 of the Government Code, the board may institute an audit or verification of an organization to ascertain whether the organization meets the requirements of Section 214.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 20, for purposes of this section “State Board of Equalization” and “board” mean the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 57.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

(a) Affidavits required for exemptions named in this article, except the homeowners’ exemption, shall be filed with the assessor between the lien date and 5 p.m. on February 15.

(b) Affidavits for the homeowners’ exemption except as otherwise provided in Sections 255.1, 255.2, and 275, shall be filed with the assessor any time after the claimant becomes eligible but no later than 5 p.m. on February 15.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), any claimant who has been found ineligible for the church exemption or the religious exemption may file an affidavit for a welfare exemption. Affidavits for the welfare exemption filed pursuant to this subdivision shall be filed within 15 days from the date of notification by the assessor of the claimants’ ineligibility for the church exemption or the religious exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 941, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

255.1.

The assessor, whenever in his judgment good cause exists, may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing a claim for the homeowners’ property tax exemption to any claimant who has filed a timely claim, but the claim is otherwise defective because it lacks either any of the required information or the signature of the claimant.

Only one extension shall be allowed to such claimant for any one filing period. No extension shall be more than six months from the due date provided for filing the claim, unless the assessor does not find and notify the claimant of the defect within a reasonable time to allow resubmission of the defective
 claim as corrected before the expiration of the six-month extension, in which case the assessor shall extend the permissible period for filing no more than three months from the time the defect or defects are found and the claimant is notified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

255.2.

Notwithstanding Section 255 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, any veteran who is filing for the veteran’s exemption on his or her principal place of residence for the first time or who was found eligible for that exemption on his or her principal place of residence in the immediately preceding year and whose claim is timely filed but disallowed for the current year may, if otherwise qualified for the homeowner’s exemption, file for the homeowner’s exemption as provided herein.

The assessor shall notify those applicants he or she finds ineligible for the veteran’s exemption of his or her finding and shall inform
 them that they have 15 days from the date of the notice to file for the homeowner’s exemption. The failure of the assessor to provide the notice required by this section shall extend the filing period for those not notified to the next lien date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

255.3.

For the 1998–99 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the assessor shall on or before January 15 mail a claim form for the homeowners’ exemption to a person acquiring title to, and recording his or her ownership of an eligible dwelling after the immediately preceding lien date and before the lien date of the calendar year of the claim. The failure of a person to receive a claim form shall not, however, excuse the person from timely filing of the required affidavit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 941, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

255.6.

The assessor shall verify the eligibility of each claimant who is receiving a homeowners’ exemption to continue to receive such an exemption in accordance with rules issued by the board to provide for a periodic audit and for the establishment of a control system for the homeowners’ exemption claims.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 60, Sec. 8) by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1107, Sec. 7.   Amendment operative beginning with 1974-75 fiscal year, by Sec. 21 of Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

255.7.

Whenever a change of ownership is recorded in the county recorder’s office, the county recorder shall provide the assessor with a copy of the transfer of ownership document as soon as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

255.8.

In counties having 10 percent or more persons who are of Spanish origin according to the most recent federal decennial census, claim forms and accompanying instructions required to be sent to homeowners by Section 255.3 shall be in English and Spanish. Claim forms and instructions in Spanish may also be sent or made available in any other county, at the discretion of the county assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

256.

(a) The affidavit for church exemption shall show that:

(1) The building and equipment are used solely for religious worship.

(2) The land claimed as exempt is required for the convenient use of the building.

(b) Each year before the lien date, county assessors shall mail a claim form for the church exemption to all recipients of such exemption in the prior year, except where the prior recipient has transferred title to the property since the prior lien
 date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

256.5.

The affidavit for the cemetery exemption shall show that:

(a) The property is used or held exclusively for the burial or other permanent deposit of the human dead or for the care, maintenance or upkeep of such property or such dead, and

(b) The property is not used or held for profit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

256.6.

(a) (1) Prior to the lien date, the assessor shall annually mail a notice to every person or entity that received, in the immediately preceding fiscal year, the exemption provided by Section 204.

(2) The board shall prescribe the form for the annual notice described in paragraph (1), which form shall specify the following:

(A) The circumstances under which the property may be disqualified from
 exemption.

(B) That the person or entity has a duty to inform the assessor if the property no longer qualifies for the exemption.

(b) At the same time the notice described in subdivision (a) is mailed, the assessor shall include with that notice a card that may be returned to the assessor by the person or entity receiving the notice, which card shall be in the following form:
To all persons and entities that have received a nonprofit cemetery exemption for the ____ fiscal year.QUESTION: Will the property to which the exemption applied in the ____ fiscal year continue to be used or held exclusively for the burial or other permanent deposit of the human dead or for the care, maintenance, or upkeep of that property or those dead in the ____ fiscal
 year?___ yes___ noSignature: ____________ Title: __________ 

Failure to return this card does not constitute a waiver of this exemption as specified by the California Constitution, but may result in an onsite inspection by the assessor to verify any exempt activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

256.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 254, 256.5, and 256.6, an affidavit claiming the cemetery exemption, as provided for in subdivision (g) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and Section 204, is not required to be filed in order to receive the exemption for any cemetery that exists, or is discovered to exist, in the unincorporated area of a county for which the assessor is unable to identify the legal cemetery authority, as defined in Section 7018 of the Health and Safety Code, that may by law claim the exemption for that
 cemetery, if both of the following apply:

(1) The cemetery was used by residents of the state prior to the year 1900.

(2) The cemetery is no longer used for current or future interments.

(b) Any tax, penalty, or interest imposed upon a cemetery subject to this section shall be canceled pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4985) of Chapter 4 of Part 9, as if it had been levied or charged erroneously.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 604, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

257.

(a) Any person claiming the religious exemption shall submit to the assessor an affidavit giving specific information relating to property tax exemption.

(b) The affidavit shall show that:

(1) The building, equipment, and land are used exclusively for religious purposes.

(2) The land claimed as exempt is required for the convenient use of the
 building.

(3) The property is owned by an entity organized and operating exclusively for religious purposes.

(4) The entity is nonprofit.

(5) No part of the net earnings inures to the benefit of any private individual.

(c) Any exemption granted pursuant to a claim filed in accordance with this section, once granted, shall remain in effect until that time that title to the property changes or the property is no longer used for exempt purposes. Any person who is granted an exemption pursuant to a claim filed in accordance with this section shall notify the assessor by February 15 if the property becomes ineligible for the exemption.

(d) Upon any indication that a religious exemption has been
 incorrectly allowed, the assessor shall make a redetermination of eligibility for the religious exemption. If the assessor determines that the property or any portion thereof is no longer eligible for the exemption, he or she shall immediately cancel the exemption on so much of the property as is no longer eligible for exemption.

If a religious exemption has been incorrectly allowed, an escape assessment as allowed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 531) of Chapter 3 in the amount of the exemption with interest as provided in Section 506 shall be made, together with a penalty for failure to notify the assessor, where applicable, in the amount of 10 percent of the assessment, but may not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in tax liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 214, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

257.1.

For the 1983–84 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, the assessor shall annually, prior to the lien date, mail a notice to every person who received the religious exemption for the previous fiscal year.

The notice shall be in a form and contain that information which the board may prescribe, and shall set forth the circumstances under which the property may no longer be eligible for exemption and advise the person of the duty to inform the assessor if the property is no longer eligible for exemption.

The notice shall include a card which is to be returned to the
 assessor by any person who desires to maintain eligibility for the religious exemption. That card shall be in the following form:To all persons who have received a religious exemption for the ________ fiscal year.QUESTION:Will the property to which the exemption applies in the ________ fiscal year continue to be used exclusively for religious purposes in the ________ fiscal year?

Yes ________ No ________Signature:______________Title: ______________Failure to return this card does not of
 itself constitute a waiver of exemption as called for by the California Constitution, but may result in onsite inspection to verify exempt activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 312, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

258.

The affidavit for the college exemption shall show that:

(a) The educational institution is of collegiate grade and is not conducted for profit.

(b) The grounds for which exemption is claimed are those within which its buildings are located.

(c) The property for which exemption is claimed is used exclusively for the purposes of education.

Any additional proof of the facts stated may be required by the assessor.

The exempt grounds need not be contiguous or in one tract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

259.

The affidavit for the exhibition exemption shall state the facts showing that the property comes within all the descriptions entitling it to the exemption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

259.5.

The claim for the welfare exemption shall show that the property use requirements entitling the property to the exemption are met, and that the claimant has a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 12.3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

259.7.

The claim for the veterans’ organization exemption shall show that the property use requirements entitling the property to the exemption are met, and that the claimant has a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 12.4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

259.8.

The affidavit for the free public libraries exemption shall indicate the extent to which the property is open to the public, whether or not any admission or user charge is made for the use of library books, periodicals or facilities and the extent (if any) to which sales or business activites are conducted on the premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

259.9.

The affidavit for the free museums exemption shall indicate whether or not any admission or user charge is made to those viewing the museum contents and the extent (if any) to which sales or business activities are conducted on the premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

259.10.

The affidavit for the public schools exemption shall show:

(a) The owner’s name and the name of the school within the public school system that is using the property exclusively for public school purposes.

(b) The terms of the agreement by which the public school obtained the use of the property. When the agreement is in writing, a copy of the document shall accompany the affidavit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

259.11.

The affidavit for the aircraft of historical significance exemption shall show that both the property and the owner meet all the requirements entitling the property to the exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1271, Sec. 7.   Effective September 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

259.13.

(a) Affidavits for the tribal housing exemption shall be filed on or before February 15 of each year with the assessor. Affidavits of claimants shall be accompanied by:

(1) The documents required by subdivision (c) of Section 237.

(2) A description of the property for which the exemption is claimed, including the entire project property and the portion for which exemption is claimed. If the property includes units
 which do not qualify for the exemption, the description must list the qualifying and nonqualifying units.

(3) An annual affidavit by the claimant that the property for which exemption is claimed meets the income and rental requirements for the exemption and listing the number of occupants in each unit for which the exemption is claimed and the income and rental limits applicable for each household. Annual tenant affidavits verifying household size and income should be on file with the claimant for each exempt unit.

(b) Once the exemption has been granted in a particular county to a particular tribe or tribally designated housing entity, documents establishing that the tribe is federally recognized and that the housing entity has been designated by the tribe need not be resubmitted for additional years or additional properties of that tribe or tribally designated housing entity in
 the same county.

(c) Once the exemption has been granted for a particular property, it is not necessary to resubmit documents establishing that there is a legally binding restriction on the use of that property in succeeding years for as long as the legally binding restriction is in effect.

(d) Upon any indication that a tribal housing exemption has been incorrectly allowed, the assessor shall make a redetermination of eligibility for the tribal housing exemption. If the assessor determines that the property or any portion thereof is no longer eligible for the exemption, he or she shall immediately cancel the exemption on so much of the property as is no longer eligible for exemption.

(e) If a tribal housing exemption has been incorrectly allowed, an escape assessment as allowed by Article 4 (commencing with Section
 531) of Chapter 3 in the amount of the exemption with interest as provided in Section 506 shall be made, together with a penalty for failure to notify the assessor, where applicable, in the amount of 10 percent of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

259.14.

(a) The claim for welfare exemption on qualified property, in addition to giving any other information as prescribed by the board, shall be accompanied by an affidavit that provides both of the following:

(1) A list of units occupied by lower income households for which the exemption is claimed.

(2) All of the following nonpersonally identifiable information about the occupants of the units listed pursuant to paragraph (1):

(A) The actual household income of the occupant.

(B) The
 maximum rent that may be charged to the occupant.

(C) The actual rent charged to the occupant.

(b) The affidavit required to accompany the claim for welfare exemption pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.

(c) For purposes of this section, “qualified property” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 214.17.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 836, Sec. 3.   (SB 996)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

259.15.

(a) (1) For the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2027–28 fiscal year, the claim for welfare exemption on a property that is eligible for and has received low-income housing tax credits pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, including Section 42(g)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of units occupied by individuals whose incomes rise above limit, in addition to giving any other information as prescribed by the board, when claiming an exemption for units pursuant to subclause (I) of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 214, shall be accompanied by an affidavit that provides the information set forth in subdivision (b).

(2) For the
 2022–23 fiscal year through the 2027–28 fiscal year, when claiming a welfare exemption for units pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 214, in addition to giving any other information as prescribed by the board, the claim for welfare exemption shall be accompanied by an affidavit that provides the information set forth in subdivision (b).

(3) Beginning with the 2024–25 fiscal year, when claiming a welfare exemption for units pursuant to subclause (II) of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 214, in addition to giving any other information as prescribed by the board, the claim for welfare exemption shall be accompanied by an affidavit that provides the information set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) The affidavits required in subdivision (a) shall include the
 following information:

(1) A list of all units, for which exemption is claimed, in which the unit will continue to be treated as a low-income unit if the occupant initially met the income limitation and the unit continues to be rent restricted.

(2) All of the following nonpersonally identifiable information about the occupants of the units listed pursuant to paragraph (1):

(A) The unit name or number.

(B) The actual household income of the occupant.

(C) The maximum rent that may be charged to the occupant.

(D) The actual rent charged to the occupant.

(E) The
 percentage of area median income, or other determinant factor, from which the maximum rent that may be charged to the occupant is derived.

(c) The affidavits required to accompany the claim for welfare exemption pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 734, Sec. 2.   (AB 84)   Effective October 11, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

If any person, claiming any exemption named in this article, fails to follow the required procedure, the exemption is waived by the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

261.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), as a prerequisite to the allowance of either the veterans’ or welfare exemption with respect to taxes on real property, the interest of the claimant in the property must be of record on the lien date in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property is located. Failure of the claimant to establish the fact of such recordation to the assessor constitutes a waiver of the exemption.

(b) A claimant for the veterans’ exemption who on the lien date has an interest in real property consisting of an
 unrecorded contract of sale may in lieu of the recordation pursuant to subdivision (a) furnish or show the contract to the assessor and file an affidavit with the assessor stating all of the following:

(1) That he purchased the real property pursuant to such unrecorded contract of sale.

(2) That under such unrecorded contract of sale he is obligated and responsible for the payment of the taxes.

(c) A claimant for the welfare exemption which on the lien date has a possessory interest in publicly owned land, owns water rights, or owns improvements on land owned by another may in lieu of the recordation pursuant to subdivision (a) file a copy of the document giving rise to that possessory interest or water rights or file a written statement attesting to the separate ownership of those improvements with the assessor.
 That document copy or written statement shall not be required annually following the year in which it has been filed but shall remain in effect until such time as that possessory interest terminates or ownership of the water rights or improvements transfers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 678, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Late Exemption Claims [270. - 279.5.]

270.

(a) With respect to property as to which the college, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, free public libraries, free museums, public schools, community colleges, state colleges, state universities, tribal housing, or welfare exemption was available but for which a timely application for exemption was not filed:

(1) Ninety percent of any tax or penalty or interest thereon shall be canceled or refunded provided an appropriate application for exemption is filed on or before the lien date in the calendar year next succeeding the calendar year in which the exemption was not claimed by a timely application.

(2) If the application is filed after the date specified in paragraph (1), 85 percent of any tax or penalty or interest thereon shall be canceled or refunded provided an appropriate application for exemption is filed and relief is not authorized under Section 214.01 or 271.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), any tax or penalty or interest thereon exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in total amount shall be canceled or refunded provided it is imposed upon property entitled to relief under subdivision (a) for which an appropriate claim for exemption has been filed.

(c) With respect to property as to which the welfare exemption or veterans’ organization exemption was available, all provisions of Section 254.5, other than the specified dates for the filing of affidavits and other acts, are applicable to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

271.

(a) Provided that an appropriate application for exemption is filed within 90 days from the first day of the month following the month in which the property was acquired or by February 15 of the following calendar year, whichever occurs first, any tax or penalty or interest imposed upon:

(1) Property owned by any organization qualified for the college, public school, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, tribal housing, or welfare
 exemption that is acquired by that organization during a given calendar year, after the lien date but before the first day of the fiscal year commencing within that calendar year, when the property is of a kind that would have been qualified for the college,
 public school, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, tribal housing, or welfare exemption if it had been owned by the organization on the lien date, shall be canceled or refunded.

(2) Property owned by any organization that would have qualified for the college, public school, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, tribal housing, or welfare exemption had the organization been in existence on the lien date, that was acquired by it during that calendar year after the lien date in that year but before the commencement of that fiscal year, and of a kind
 that presently qualifies for the exemption and that would have so qualified for that fiscal year had it been owned by the organization on the lien date and had the organization been in existence on the lien date, shall be canceled or refunded.

(3) Property acquired after the beginning of any fiscal year by an organization qualified for the college, public school, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, tribal housing, or welfare exemption and the property is of a kind that would have qualified for an exemption if it had been owned by the organization on the lien date, whether or not that organization was in existence on the lien date, shall be canceled or refunded in the proportion that the number of days for which the property was so qualified during the fiscal year bears to 365.

(b) Eighty-five percent of any tax or penalty or interest thereon imposed upon property that would be entitled to relief under subdivision (a) or Section 214.01, except that an appropriate application for exemption was not filed within the time required by the applicable provision, shall be canceled or refunded provided that an appropriate application for exemption is filed after the last day on which relief could be granted under subdivision (a) or Section 214.01.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any tax or penalty or interest thereon exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in total amount shall be canceled or refunded provided it is imposed upon property entitled to relief under subdivision (b) for which an appropriate claim for exemption has been filed.

(d) With respect to property acquired after the beginning
 of the fiscal year for which relief is sought, subdivisions (b) and (c) shall apply only to that pro rata portion of any tax or penalty or interest thereon that would have been canceled or refunded had the property qualified for relief under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 72, Sec. 3.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

271.5.

(a) In the event that property receiving the college, public school, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, tribal housing, or welfare exemption is sold or otherwise transferred, the exemption shall cease to apply on the date of that sale or transfer. A new exemption shall be available subject to the provisions of Section 271.

(b) Termination of the exemption under this section shall result in an escape assessment of the property pursuant to Section 531.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 72, Sec. 4.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

272.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a valid application for exemption on the property is filed pursuant to Section 270 or 271 and the assessor grants the claim prior to the completion of the roll for the year for which the exemption is claimed, the assessor shall enroll the property so as to provide for the amount of exemption on the property’s assessed value as provided by the applicable section.

When the application for exemption on the property or the granting of the claim occurs after completion of the roll, the assessor shall initiate an action to correct the roll by addition of the appropriate amount of exemption on the property. Upon notification by the assessor, the auditor shall make the appropriate adjustment on the roll.

Where authorized under the provisions of this article, the tax, penalty or interest thereon subject to cancellation or refund shall be canceled pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4985) of Chapter 4 of Part 9, as if it had been levied or charged erroneously, and, if paid, a refund thereof shall be made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5096) of Chapter 5 of Part 9 as if it had been erroneously collected. The amount of tax, penalty or interest which is not canceled or refunded under this article with respect to property tax exemptions covered by this article and filed late may be paid in installments as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4186) of Part 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 12.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

273.
